Maryland, session 2025, SB0343.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Procedure
SUBTITLE 5. STATE’S ATTORNEY CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM GRANT FUND.
15–501.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM” MEANS AN ELECTRONIC PROGRAM THAT
IS CAPABLE OF COLLECTING DATA ABOUT ARRESTS, CHARGING DECISIONS, AND
OTHER INFORMATION ABOUT A CASE HANDLED BY A STATE’S ATTORNEY.
(C) “EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR” MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE
GOVERNOR’S OFFICE OF CRIME PREVENTION AND POLICY.
(D) “FUND” MEANS THE STATE’S ATTORNEY CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM
GRANT FUND.
15–502.
(A) THERE IS A STATE’S ATTORNEY CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM GRANT
FUND.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO STATE’S
ATTORNEYS’ OFFICES TO ESTABLISH OR IMPROVE CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS.
(C) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(D) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 343 3
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND IN CONJUNCTION WITH
THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR.
(E) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO STATE’S
ATTORNEYS’ OFFICES TO ESTABLISH OR IMPROVE CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS.
(G) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(H) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(I) THE ACCOUNTS AND TRANSACTIONS OF THE FUND SHALL BE SUBJECT
TO AUDIT BY THE LEGISLATIVE AUDITOR AS PROVIDED IN § 2–1220 OF THE STATE
GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
15–503.
(A) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR STATE’S ATTORNEYS’ OFFICES TO
APPLY FOR AND RECEIVE GRANTS FROM THE FUND; AND
(2) SOLICIT GRANT PROPOSALS FROM STATE’S ATTORNEYS’ OFFICES.
(B) A STATE’S ATTORNEY’S OFFICE THAT APPLIES FOR A GRANT FROM THE
FUND SHALL PROVIDE THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR WITH:
(1) A DESCRIPTION OF THE CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM THAT THE
STATE’S ATTORNEY’S OFFICE SEEKS TO ESTABLISH OR THE IMPROVEMENTS THAT

SENATE BILL 343
THE STATE’S ATTORNEY’S OFFICE SEEKS TO MAKE TO AN EXISTING CASE
MANAGEMENT SYSTEM; AND
(2) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR
CONSIDERS NECESSARY.
(C) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL MAKE GRANTS FROM THE FUND TO
STATE’S ATTORNEYS’ OFFICES FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT OR IMPROVEMENT OF
CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEMS.
(D) A STATE’S ATTORNEY’S OFFICE THAT RECEIVES A GRANT FROM THE
FUND SHALL SUBMIT TO THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR PROOF OF THE EXPENDITURE
OF THE GRANT FUNDS.
(E) MONEY DISTRIBUTED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE USED TO
SUPPLEMENT AND NOT SUPPLANT ANY OTHER FUNDING FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT
OR IMPROVEMENT OF A CASE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE STATE’S ATTORNEY CASE MANAGEMENT
SYSTEM GRANT FUND.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND, That:

SENATE BILL 343 5
(a) There is a Task Force to Study Transparency Standards for State’s Attorneys.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland and two members of the
community, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates and two members of the
community, appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(3) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Maryland State Commission on Criminal
Sentencing Policy, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(5) one representative of the Administrative Office of the Courts, appointed
by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court of Maryland;
(6) one representative of the Vera Institute of Justice, appointed by the
Governor;
(7) the Chair of the Attorney Grievance Commission, or the Chair’s
designee;
(8) one representative of a crime victims’ advocacy group, appointed by the
Governor;
(9) the Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and
Policy, or the Executive Director’s designee;
(10) the Attorney General, or the Attorney General’s designee;
(11) the Public Defender of Maryland, or the Public Defender’s designee; and
(12) one expert on data and transparency standards, appointed by the
Governor.
(c) The President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House shall each designate
one cochair of the Task Force.
(d) The Department of Legislative Services shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but

SENATE BILL 343
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) (1) The Task Force shall study the possibility of establishing minimum
transparency standards for State’s Attorneys.
(2) In conducting its study, the Task Force shall:
(i) develop processes by which prosecutors can collect information
and determine what information should be made public and what information may be kept
private; and
(ii) examine any existing policies of State’s Attorneys’ offices across
the State relating to the transparency of data, the charging of crimes, and sentencing; and
(iii) identify sustainable funding sources to implement
recommendations made by the Task Force, including recommendations made by the Task
Force’s predecessor Task Force established under Chapter 141 of the Acts of the General
Assembly of 2022.
(g) On or before December 31 each year beginning December 31, 2025, the Task
Force shall report its findings and recommendations to the Senate Judicial Proceedings
Committee and the House Judiciary Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That it is the intent of the
General Assembly that the Governor appoint to the Task Force to Study Transparency
Standards for State’s Attorneys those individuals who formerly were appointed to the
predecessor Task Force established under Chapter 141 of the Acts of the General Assembly
of 2022 and who were serving on the Task Force as of June 30, 2024, in addition to the
member required to be part of the Task Force under item (12) of subsection (b) of Section 2
1 of this Act.
SECTION 4. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at
the end of June 30, 2028, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.